Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.320

Enhanced 911 service—Common and public school service required.

By January 1, 1997, or one year after enhanced 911 service becomes available or a private switch automatic location identification service approved by the Washington utilities and transportation commission is available from the serving local exchange telecommunications company, whichever is later, all common and public schools located in counties that provide enhanced 911 service shall provide persons using school facilities direct access to telephones that are connected to the public switched network such that calls to 911 result in automatic location identification for each telephone in a format that is compatible with the existing and planned county enhanced 911 system during all times that the facility is in use. Any school district acquiring a private telecommunications system that allows connection to the public switched network after January 1, 1997, shall assure that the telecommunications system is connected to the public switched network such that calls to 911 result in automatic location identification for each telephone in a format that is compatible with the existing or planned county enhanced 911 system.

[ 1995 c 243 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1995 c 243: See notes following RCW 80.36.555.